North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Article 17. Transition and Curative Provisions.

§ 55-17-01.
Applicability of act.

The provisions of this Chapter shall apply to every corporation for profit, and, so far as appropriate, to every corporation not for profit having a capital stock, now existing or hereafter formed, and to the outstanding and future securities thereof, except to the extent the corporation is expressly excepted by this Chapter from its operation or except to the extent that there is other specific statutory provision particularly applicable to the corporation or inconsistent with some provisions of this Chapter, in which case that other provision prevails.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, no corporation not for profit having a capital stock and formed for religious, charitable, nonprofit, social, or literary purposes shall hereafter be formed under this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 550, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-17-02.
Application to qualified foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State on July 1, 1990 is subject to this Chapter but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 979, ss. 18, 19; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-17-03.
Saving provisions.

The existence of corporations formed before July 1, 1990, shall not be impaired by the enactment of this Chapter nor by any change made by this Chapter in the requirements for the formation of corporations nor by any amendment or repeal by this Chapter of the laws under which they were formed or created, and, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Chapter, the repeal of a prior act by this Chapter shall not affect any liability or penalty incurred, under the provisions of such act, prior to the repeal thereof.

Any proceeding or corporate action commenced before July 1, 1990, may be completed in accordance with the law then in effect.

A corporation dissolved by operation of law before July 1, 1990, may wind up and liquidate its business and affairs pursuant to the provisions of Article 14 of this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 550, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 218, s. 1.

§ 55-17-04.
Severability.

If any provision of this Chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the Chapter are severable.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-17-05.
Curative statute.

All deeds, conveyances and other instruments executed prior to the effective date of this Chapter and validated by the curative provisions of former G.S. 55-36.1 and former Article 12 of Chapter 55 as they were immediately prior to such effective date shall be valid and effective to the same extent as if those provisions had not been amended or repealed. The provisions of former G.S. 55-36 shall continue to apply to all instruments executed before July 1, 1990, to which that section applied.

History.

1905, c. 316; Rev., s. 1248; 1939, c. 23; 1941, c. 294; 1943, c. 219, s. 11/2; 1947, c. 504, ss. 1, 2; 1949, c. 436; c. 825; 1951, c. 395; C.S., s. 1134; G.S., ss. 55-35, 55-41, 55-41.1, 55-41.2, 55-42, 55-164.1, 55-164.2; 1955, c. 1371, s. 2; 1957, c. 500, s. 2; 1969, c. 953, s. 1; 1971, c. 60; 1977, c. 40, s. 1; 1979, c. 364; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 647, s. 1.

§ 55-17-99.

TABLES OF COMPARABLE
SECTIONS FOR
CHAPTER 55

Former to Present

Editor’s Note.

— The following table shows G.S. sections from former Chapter 55 and their comparable, new Chapter 55 numbers. Where there is no comparable, new number, the term “None” has been inserted.

tablenum=“=table24” align=“left”>
=c1 55-24
. . . . .
55-8-01 =c2 55-8-02 =c1 55-25
. . . . .
55-8-03, =c2 55-8-04, =c2 55-8-05 =c1 55-26
. . . . .
55-8-06 =c1 55-27
. . . . .
55-8-07
to 55-8-10 =c1 55-28
. . . . .
55-8-20 to 55-8-24 =c1 55-29
. . . . .
55-8-21, 55-8-20(b) =c1 55-30
. . . . .
55-8-11, 55-8-31 =c1 55-31
. . . . .
55-8-25 =c1 55-32
. . . . .
55-8-33, =c2 55-8-24(d), =c2 55-6-40(d) =c1 55-33
. . . . .
None =c1 55-34
. . . . .
55-8-40, 55-8-41, =c2 55-8-43(b), =c2 55-8-44(b) =c1 55-35
. . . . .
55-8-30, 55-8-42 =c1 55-36
. . . . .
None =c1 55-36.1
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-37
. . . . .
55-16-01,
55-16-02, =c2 55-16-20 =c1 55-37.1
. . . . .
55-16-01 =c1 55-38
. . . . .
55-16-02, 55-16-03, =c2 55-16-04, =c2 55-16-20 =c1 55-39
. . . . .
None =c1 55-40
. . . . .
55-6-01, 55-6-03 =c1 55-40.1
. . . . .
55-6-21 =c1 55-41
. . . . .
55-6-01 =c1 55-42
. . . . .
55-6-02 =c1 55-43
. . . . .
55-6-20 =c1 55-44
. . . . .
55-6-24 =c1 55-44.1
. . . . .
55-7-21.1 =c1 55-45
. . . . .
None =c1 55-46
. . . . .
55-6-21 =c1 55-47
. . . . .
None =c1 55-48
. . . . .
None =c1 55-49
. . . . .
55-6-40(d) =c1 55-50
. . . . .
55-6-40 =c1 55-51
. . . . .
55-6-23 =c1 55-52
. . . . .
55-6-31, 55-6-40 =c1 55-53
. . . . .
55-6-22 =c1 55-54
. . . . .
55-8-33(b)(2), 55-14-08 =c1 55-55
. . . . .
55-7-40 =c1 55-56
. . . . .
55-6-30 =c1 55-57
. . . . .
55-6-25 =c1 55-58
. . . . .
55-6-04 =c1 55-59
. . . . .
55-7-24 =c1 55-60
. . . . .
55-7-07 =c1 55-61
. . . . .
55-7-01, 55-7-02, =c2 55-7-03 =c1 55-62
. . . . .
55-7-05 =c1 55-63
. . . . .
55-7-04 =c1 55-64
. . . . .
55-7-20 =c1 55-65
. . . . .
55-7-25 =c1 55-66
. . . . .
55-7-25, 55-7-27 =c1 55-67
. . . . .
55-7-21 =c1 55-67(c)
. . . . .
55-7-28 =c1 55-68
. . . . .
55-7-22 =c1 55-69
. . . . .
55-7-24(b) =c1 55-70, 55-71
. . . . .
None =c1 55-72
. . . . .
55-7-30 =c1 55-73
. . . . .
55-7-31 =c1 55-74
. . . . .
None =c1 55-75
. . . . .
55-9-01 =c1 55-76
. . . . .
55-9-02 =c1 55-77
. . . . .
55-9-03 =c1 55-78
. . . . .
55-9-04 =c1 55-79
. . . . .
55-9-05 =c1 55-79.1 to 55-89
. . . . .
None =c1 55-90
. . . . .
55-9A-01 =c1 55-91
. . . . .
55-9A-02 =c1 55-92
. . . . .
55-9A-03 =c1 55-93
. . . . .
55-9A-04 =c1 55-94
. . . . .
55-9A-05 =c1 55-95
. . . . .
55-9A-06 =c1 55-96
. . . . .
None =c1 55-97
. . . . .
55-9A-07 =c1 55-98
. . . . .
None =c1 55-98.1
. . . . .
55-9A-09 =c1 55-99
. . . . .
55-10-01 =c1 55-100
. . . . .
55-10-02, 55-10-03, =c2 55-10-05 =c1 55-101
. . . . .
55-10-04 to 55-13-02 =c1 55-102
. . . . .
None =c1 55-103
. . . . .
55-10-06 =c1 55-104
. . . . .
55-10-09 =c1 55-105
. . . . .
55-10-07 =c1 55-106
. . . . .
55-11-01 =c1 55-107
. . . . .
None =c1 55-108
. . . . .
55-11-03, 55-13-20 =c1 55-108.1
. . . . .
55-11-03(g), 55-11-04 =c1 55-109
. . . . .
55-11-05 =c1 55-110
. . . . .
55-11-06 =c1 55-111
. . . . .
55-11-07 =c1 55-112
. . . . .
55-12-01, 55-12-02, =c2 55-13-02, =c2 55-13-20 =c1 55-113
. . . . .
55-13-1 to 55-13-3, =c2 55-13-20 to =c2 55-13-26, =c2 55-13-28, =c2 55-13-30, =c2 55-13-31 =c1 55-113.1
. . . . .
55-14A-01 =c1 55-114
. . . . .
55-14-05, 55-14-06, =c2 55-14-07, =c2 55-14-08 =c1 55-115
. . . . .
None =c1 55-116
. . . . .
55-14-01 to 55-14-03 =c1 55-117
. . . . .
None =c1 55-118
. . . . .
55-14-02, 55-14-03 =c1 55-119
. . . . .
55-14-05 to 55-14-07 =c1 55-119(c)
. . . . .
55-13-02 =c1 55-120
. . . . .
55-14-04 =c1 55-121
. . . . .
None =c1 55-122
. . . . .
55-14-30 =c1 55-123
. . . . .
None =c1 55-124
. . . . .
55-14-31 =c1 55-125
. . . . .
55-14-30, 55-14-31, =c2 55-14-33 =c1 55-125.1
. . . . .
55-14-31 =c1 55-126
. . . . .
55-14-30 =c1 55-127
. . . . .
55-14-32 =c1 55-128
. . . . .
None =c1 55-129
. . . . .
55-14-33 =c1 55-130
. . . . .
55-14-40 =c1 55-130.1
. . . . .
55-14-01 =c1 55-131
. . . . .
55-15-01 =c1 55-132
. . . . .
55-15-05 =c1 55-133 to 55-136
. . . . .
None =c1 55-137
. . . . .
55-15-06 =c1 55-138
. . . . .
55-15-03 =c1 55-139
. . . . .
55-15-03 =c1 55-140
. . . . .
55-15-05 =c1 55-141
. . . . .
55-15-07 =c1 55-142
. . . . .
55-15-08 =c1 55-143
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-144
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-145
. . . . .
None =c1 55-146
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-146.1 to 55-148
. . . . .
None =c1 55-149
. . . . .
55-15-04 =c1 55-150
. . . . .
55-15-20 =c1 55-151
. . . . .
55-15-30, 55-15-31 =c1 55-152
. . . . .
55-15-31 =c1 55-153
. . . . .
55-17-02 =c1 55-154
. . . . .
55-15-02 =c1 55-155
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-156
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-157 to 55-163
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-164, 55-164.1
. . . . .
None =c1 55-164.2
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-165
. . . . .
55-1-31 =c1 55-166
. . . . .
55-1-32 =c1 55-167
. . . . .
55-1-33 =c1 55-168
. . . . .
55-1-30 =c1 55-169
. . . . .
55-1-25(d), 55-1-27, =c2 55-1-28(c) =c1 55-170
. . . . .
55-1-21 =c1 55-171
. . . . .
None =c1 55-172
. . . . .
55-7-06 to 55-8-23 =c1 55-173
. . . . .
None =c1 55-174
. . . . .
55-1-02 =c1 55-175
. . . . .
None =te

Present to Former =c1 55-60
. . . . .
55-7-07 =c1 55-61
. . . . .
55-7-01, 55-7-02, =c2 55-7-03 =c1 55-62
. . . . .
55-7-05 =c1 55-63
. . . . .
55-7-04 =c1 55-64
. . . . .
55-7-20 =c1 55-65
. . . . .
55-7-25 =c1 55-66
. . . . .
55-7-25, 55-7-27 =c1 55-67
. . . . .
55-7-21 =c1 55-67(c)
. . . . .
55-7-28 =c1 55-68
. . . . .
55-7-22 =c1 55-69
. . . . .
55-7-24(b) =c1 55-70, 55-71
. . . . .
None =c1 55-72
. . . . .
55-7-30 =c1 55-73
. . . . .
55-7-31 =c1 55-74
. . . . .
None =c1 55-75
. . . . .
55-9-01 =c1 55-76
. . . . .
55-9-02 =c1 55-77
. . . . .
55-9-03 =c1 55-78
. . . . .
55-9-04 =c1 55-79
. . . . .
55-9-05 =c1 55-79.1 to 55-89
. . . . .
None =c1 55-90
. . . . .
55-9A-01 =c1 55-91
. . . . .
55-9A-02 =c1 55-92
. . . . .
55-9A-03 =c1 55-93
. . . . .
55-9A-04 =c1 55-94
. . . . .
55-9A-05 =c1 55-95
. . . . .
55-9A-06 =c1 55-96
. . . . .
None =c1 55-97
. . . . .
55-9A-07 =c1 55-98
. . . . .
None =c1 55-98.1
. . . . .
55-9A-09 =c1 55-99
. . . . .
55-10-01 =c1 55-100
. . . . .
55-10-02, 55-10-03, =c2 55-10-05 =c1 55-101
. . . . .
55-10-04 to 55-13-02 =c1 55-102
. . . . .
None =c1 55-103
. . . . .
55-10-06 =c1 55-104
. . . . .
55-10-09 =c1 55-105
. . . . .
55-10-07 =c1 55-106
. . . . .
55-11-01 =c1 55-107
. . . . .
None =c1 55-108
. . . . .
55-11-03, 55-13-20 =c1 55-108.1
. . . . .
55-11-03(g), 55-11-04 =c1 55-109
. . . . .
55-11-05 =c1 55-110
. . . . .
55-11-06 =c1 55-111
. . . . .
55-11-07 =c1 55-112
. . . . .
55-12-01, 55-12-02, =c2 55-13-02, =c2 55-13-20 =c1 55-113
. . . . .
55-13-1 to 55-13-3, =c2 55-13-20 to =c2 55-13-26, =c2 55-13-28, =c2 55-13-30, =c2 55-13-31 =c1 55-113.1
. . . . .
55-14A-01 =c1 55-114
. . . . .
55-14-05, 55-14-06, =c2 55-14-07, =c2 55-14-08 =c1 55-115
. . . . .
None =c1 55-116
. . . . .
55-14-01 to 55-14-03 =c1 55-117
. . . . .
None =c1 55-118
. . . . .
55-14-02, 55-14-03 =c1 55-119
. . . . .
55-14-05 to 55-14-07 =c1 55-119(c)
. . . . .
55-13-02 =c1 55-120
. . . . .
55-14-04 =c1 55-121
. . . . .
None =c1 55-122
. . . . .
55-14-30 =c1 55-123
. . . . .
None =c1 55-124
. . . . .
55-14-31 =c1 55-125
. . . . .
55-14-30, 55-14-31, =c2 55-14-33 =c1 55-125.1
. . . . .
55-14-31 =c1 55-126
. . . . .
55-14-30 =c1 55-127
. . . . .
55-14-32 =c1 55-128
. . . . .
None =c1 55-129
. . . . .
55-14-33 =c1 55-130
. . . . .
55-14-40 =c1 55-130.1
. . . . .
55-14-01 =c1 55-131
. . . . .
55-15-01 =c1 55-132
. . . . .
55-15-05 =c1 55-133 to 55-136
. . . . .
None =c1 55-137
. . . . .
55-15-06 =c1 55-138
. . . . .
55-15-03 =c1 55-139
. . . . .
55-15-03 =c1 55-140
. . . . .
55-15-05 =c1 55-141
. . . . .
55-15-07 =c1 55-142
. . . . .
55-15-08 =c1 55-143
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-144
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-145
. . . . .
None =c1 55-146
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-146.1 to 55-148
. . . . .
None =c1 55-149
. . . . .
55-15-04 =c1 55-150
. . . . .
55-15-20 =c1 55-151
. . . . .
55-15-30, 55-15-31 =c1 55-152
. . . . .
55-15-31 =c1 55-153
. . . . .
55-17-02 =c1 55-154
. . . . .
55-15-02 =c1 55-155
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-156
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-157 to 55-163
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-164, 55-164.1
. . . . .
None =c1 55-164.2
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-165
. . . . .
55-1-31 =c1 55-166
. . . . .
55-1-32 =c1 55-167
. . . . .
55-1-33 =c1 55-168
. . . . .
55-1-30 =c1 55-169
. . . . .
55-1-25(d), 55-1-27, =c2 55-1-28(c) =c1 55-170
. . . . .
55-1-21 =c1 55-171
. . . . .
None =c1 55-172
. . . . .
55-7-06 to 55-8-23 =c1 55-173
. . . . .
None =c1 55-174
. . . . .
55-1-02 =c1 55-175
. . . . .
None =te

Present to Former =c1 55-108
. . . . .
55-11-03, 55-13-20 =c1 55-108.1
. . . . .
55-11-03(g), 55-11-04 =c1 55-109
. . . . .
55-11-05 =c1 55-110
. . . . .
55-11-06 =c1 55-111
. . . . .
55-11-07 =c1 55-112
. . . . .
55-12-01, 55-12-02, =c2 55-13-02, =c2 55-13-20 =c1 55-113
. . . . .
55-13-1 to 55-13-3, =c2 55-13-20 to =c2 55-13-26, =c2 55-13-28, =c2 55-13-30, =c2 55-13-31 =c1 55-113.1
. . . . .
55-14A-01 =c1 55-114
. . . . .
55-14-05, 55-14-06, =c2 55-14-07, =c2 55-14-08 =c1 55-115
. . . . .
None =c1 55-116
. . . . .
55-14-01 to 55-14-03 =c1 55-117
. . . . .
None =c1 55-118
. . . . .
55-14-02, 55-14-03 =c1 55-119
. . . . .
55-14-05 to 55-14-07 =c1 55-119(c)
. . . . .
55-13-02 =c1 55-120
. . . . .
55-14-04 =c1 55-121
. . . . .
None =c1 55-122
. . . . .
55-14-30 =c1 55-123
. . . . .
None =c1 55-124
. . . . .
55-14-31 =c1 55-125
. . . . .
55-14-30, 55-14-31, =c2 55-14-33 =c1 55-125.1
. . . . .
55-14-31 =c1 55-126
. . . . .
55-14-30 =c1 55-127
. . . . .
55-14-32 =c1 55-128
. . . . .
None =c1 55-129
. . . . .
55-14-33 =c1 55-130
. . . . .
55-14-40 =c1 55-130.1
. . . . .
55-14-01 =c1 55-131
. . . . .
55-15-01 =c1 55-132
. . . . .
55-15-05 =c1 55-133 to 55-136
. . . . .
None =c1 55-137
. . . . .
55-15-06 =c1 55-138
. . . . .
55-15-03 =c1 55-139
. . . . .
55-15-03 =c1 55-140
. . . . .
55-15-05 =c1 55-141
. . . . .
55-15-07 =c1 55-142
. . . . .
55-15-08 =c1 55-143
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-144
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-145
. . . . .
None =c1 55-146
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-146.1 to 55-148
. . . . .
None =c1 55-149
. . . . .
55-15-04 =c1 55-150
. . . . .
55-15-20 =c1 55-151
. . . . .
55-15-30, 55-15-31 =c1 55-152
. . . . .
55-15-31 =c1 55-153
. . . . .
55-17-02 =c1 55-154
. . . . .
55-15-02 =c1 55-155
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-156
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-157 to 55-163
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-164, 55-164.1
. . . . .
None =c1 55-164.2
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-165
. . . . .
55-1-31 =c1 55-166
. . . . .
55-1-32 =c1 55-167
. . . . .
55-1-33 =c1 55-168
. . . . .
55-1-30 =c1 55-169
. . . . .
55-1-25(d), 55-1-27, =c2 55-1-28(c) =c1 55-170
. . . . .
55-1-21 =c1 55-171
. . . . .
None =c1 55-172
. . . . .
55-7-06 to 55-8-23 =c1 55-173
. . . . .
None =c1 55-174
. . . . .
55-1-02 =c1 55-175
. . . . .
None =te
Present to Former =c1 55-139
. . . . .
55-15-03 =c1 55-140
. . . . .
55-15-05 =c1 55-141
. . . . .
55-15-07 =c1 55-142
. . . . .
55-15-08 =c1 55-143
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-144
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-145
. . . . .
None =c1 55-146
. . . . .
55-15-10 =c1 55-146.1 to 55-148
. . . . .
None =c1 55-149
. . . . .
55-15-04 =c1 55-150
. . . . .
55-15-20 =c1 55-151
. . . . .
55-15-30, 55-15-31 =c1 55-152
. . . . .
55-15-31 =c1 55-153
. . . . .
55-17-02 =c1 55-154
. . . . .
55-15-02 =c1 55-155
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-156
. . . . .
55-1-22 =c1 55-157 to 55-163
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-164, 55-164.1
. . . . .
None =c1 55-164.2
. . . . .
55-17-05 =c1 55-165
. . . . .
55-1-31 =c1 55-166
. . . . .
55-1-32 =c1 55-167
. . . . .
55-1-33 =c1 55-168
. . . . .
55-1-30 =c1 55-169
. . . . .
55-1-25(d), 55-1-27, =c2 55-1-28(c) =c1 55-170
. . . . .
55-1-21 =c1 55-171
. . . . .
None =c1 55-172
. . . . .
55-7-06 to 55-8-23 =c1 55-173
. . . . .
None =c1 55-174
. . . . .
55-1-02 =c1 55-175
. . . . .
None =te
Present to Former

Editor’s Note.

— The following table shows G.S. sections of current Chapter 55 and their comparable, former Chapter 55 sections numbers. Where there is no comparable, former Chapter 55 number, the term “None” has been inserted.

tablenum=“=table24” align=“left”> =c1 55-6-02
. . . . .
55-42 =c1 55-6-03
. . . . .
55-40 =c1 55-6-04
. . . . .
55-58 =c1 55-6-20
. . . . .
55-43 =c1 55-6-21
. . . . .
55-40.1, =c2 55-46 =c1 55-6-22
. . . . .
55-53 =c1 55-6-23
. . . . .
55-51 =c1 55-6-24
. . . . .
55-44 =c1 55-6-25
. . . . .
55-57 =c1 55-6-26 to 55-6-28
. . . . .
None =c1 55-6-30
. . . . .
55-56 =c1 55-6-31
. . . . .
55-52 =c1 55-6-40
. . . . .
55-50, =c2 55-52 =c1 55-6-40(d)
. . . . .
55-32, =c2 55-49 =c1 55-7-01 to 55-7-03
. . . . .
55-61 =c1 55-7-04
. . . . .
55-63 =c1 55-7-05
. . . . .
55-62 =c1 55-7-06
. . . . .
55-172 =c1 55-7-07
. . . . .
55-60 =c1 55-7-20
. . . . .
55-64 =c1 55-7-21
. . . . .
55-67 =c1 55-7-21.1
. . . . .
55-44.1 =c1 55-7-22
. . . . .
55-68 =c1 55-7-23
. . . . .
None =c1 55-7-24
. . . . .
55-59 =c1 55-7-24(b)
. . . . .
55-69 =c1 55-7-25
. . . . .
55-65, =c2 55-66 =c1 55-7-26
. . . . .
None =c1 55-7-27
. . . . .
55-16, =c2 55-66 =c1 55-7-28
. . . . .
55-67(c) =c1 55-7-30
. . . . .
55-72 =c1 55-7-31
. . . . .
55-73 =c1 55-7-40
. . . . .
55-55 =c1 55-8-01, 55-8-02
. . . . .
55-24 =c1 55-8-03 to 55-8-05
. . . . .
55-25 =c1 55-8-06
. . . . .
55-26 =c1 55-8-07 to 55-8-10
. . . . .
55-27 =c1 55-8-11
. . . . .
55-30 =c1 55-8-20
. . . . .
55-28 =c1 55-8-20(b)
. . . . .
55-29(c) =c1 55-8-21
. . . . .
55-28, =c2 55-29 =c1 55-8-22
. . . . .
55-28(c) =c1 55-8-23
. . . . .
55-28, =c2 55-172 =c1 55-8-24
. . . . .
55-28(d) =c1 55-8-24(d)
. . . . .
55-32(h) =c1 55-8-25
. . . . .
55-31 =c1 55-8-30
. . . . .
55-35 =c1 55-8-31
. . . . .
55-30(b) =c1 55-8-32
. . . . .
55-22 =c1 55-8-33
. . . . .
55-32 =c1 55-8-33(b)(2)
. . . . .
55-54 =c1 55-8-40, 55-8-41
. . . . .
55-34 =c1 55-8-42
. . . . .
55-35 =c1 55-8-43(b)
. . . . .
55-34(d) =c1 55-8-44(b)
. . . . .
55-34(d) =c1 55-8-50, 55-8-51
. . . . .
55-20 =c1 55-8-52
. . . . .
55-20, =c2 55-21 =c1 55-8-53
. . . . .
55-19 =c1 55-8-54
. . . . .
55-20, =c2 55-21 =c1 55-8-55, 55-8-56
. . . . .
55-20 =c1 55-8-57
. . . . .
55-19 =c1 55-8-58
. . . . .
None =c1 55-9-01
. . . . .
55-75 =c1 55-9-02
. . . . .
55-76 =c1 55-9-03
. . . . .
55-77 =c1 55-9-04
. . . . .
55-78 =c1 55-9-05
. . . . .
55-79 =c1 55-9A-01
. . . . .
55-90 =c1 55-9A-02
. . . . .
55-91 =c1 55-9A-03
. . . . .
55-92 =c1 55-9A-04
. . . . .
55-93 =c1 55-9A-05
. . . . .
55-94 =c1 55-9A-06
. . . . .
55-95 =c1 55-9A-07
. . . . .
55-97 =c1 55-9A-08
. . . . .
None =c1 55-9A-09
. . . . .
55-98.1 =c1 55-10-01
. . . . .
55-99 =c1 55-10-02, 55-10-03
. . . . .
55-100 =c1 55-10-04
. . . . .
55-101 =c1 55-10-05
. . . . .
55-100 =c1 55-10-06
. . . . .
55-103 =c1 55-10-07
. . . . .
55-105 =c1 55-10-09
. . . . .
55-104 =c1 55-10-20
. . . . .
55-16(a) =c1 55-10-22
. . . . .
55-16 =c1 55-11-01
. . . . .
55-106 =c1 55-11-02
. . . . .
None =c1 55-11-03
. . . . .
55-108 =c1 55-11-03(g)
. . . . .
55-108.1 =c1 55-11-04
. . . . .
55-108.1 =c1 55-11-05
. . . . .
55-109 =c1 55-11-06
. . . . .
55-110 =c1 55-11-07
. . . . .
55-111 =c1 55-11-08
. . . . .
None =c1 55-12-01, 55-12-02
. . . . .
55-112 =c1 55-12-03
. . . . .
None =c1 55-13-01
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-13-02
. . . . .
55-101, =c2 55-112, 55-113, =c2 55-119 =c1 55-13-03
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-13-20
. . . . .
55-108, =c2 55-112, 55-113 =c1 55-13-21 to 55-13-26, =c1 55-13-28, 55-13-30, =c1 55-13-31
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-14-01
. . . . .
55-116, =c2 55-130.1 =c1 55-14-02
. . . . .
55-118 =c1 55-14-03
. . . . .
55-116, =c2 55-118 =c1 55-14-04
. . . . .
55-120 =c1 55-14-05 to =c1 55-14-07
. . . . .
55-114, =c2 55-119 =c1 55-14-08
. . . . .
55-54, =c2 55-114 =c1 55-14-20 to 55-14-24
. . . . .
None =c1 55-14-30
. . . . .
55-122, =c2 55-125, 55-126 =c1 55-14-31
. . . . .
55-124 =c2 to 55-125.1 =c1 55-14-32
. . . . .
55-127 =c1 55-14-33
. . . . .
55-125, =c2 55-129 =c1 55-14-40
. . . . .
55-130 =c1 55-14A-01
. . . . .
55-113.1 =c1 55-15-01
. . . . .
55-131 =c1 55-15-02
. . . . .
55-154 =c1 55-15-03
. . . . .
55-138, =c2 55-139 =c1 55-15-04
. . . . .
55-149 =c1 55-15-05
. . . . .
55-132, =c2 55-140 =c1 55-15-06
. . . . .
55-137 =c1 55-15-07
. . . . .
55-141 =c1 55-15-08
. . . . .
55-142 =c1 55-15-09
. . . . .
None =c1 55-15-10
. . . . .
55-143, =c2 55-144, 55-146 =c1 55-15-20
. . . . .
55-150 =c1 55-15-30
. . . . .
55-151 =c1 55-15-31
. . . . .
55-151, =c2 55-152 =c1 55-15-32, 55-15-33
. . . . .
None =c1 55-16-01
. . . . .
55-37 =c1 55-16-01(d)
. . . . .
55-37.1 =c1 55-16-02
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-03, 55-16-04
. . . . .
55-38 =c1 55-16-20
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-21, 55-16-22
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-01
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-02
. . . . .
55-153 =c1 55-17-03
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-04
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-05
. . . . .
55-36.1, =c2 55-157 to =c2 55-163, 55-164.2 =te =c1 55-8-01, 55-8-02
. . . . .
55-24 =c1 55-8-03 to 55-8-05
. . . . .
55-25 =c1 55-8-06
. . . . .
55-26 =c1 55-8-07 to 55-8-10
. . . . .
55-27 =c1 55-8-11
. . . . .
55-30 =c1 55-8-20
. . . . .
55-28 =c1 55-8-20(b)
. . . . .
55-29(c) =c1 55-8-21
. . . . .
55-28, =c2 55-29 =c1 55-8-22
. . . . .
55-28(c) =c1 55-8-23
. . . . .
55-28, =c2 55-172 =c1 55-8-24
. . . . .
55-28(d) =c1 55-8-24(d)
. . . . .
55-32(h) =c1 55-8-25
. . . . .
55-31 =c1 55-8-30
. . . . .
55-35 =c1 55-8-31
. . . . .
55-30(b) =c1 55-8-32
. . . . .
55-22 =c1 55-8-33
. . . . .
55-32 =c1 55-8-33(b)(2)
. . . . .
55-54 =c1 55-8-40, 55-8-41
. . . . .
55-34 =c1 55-8-42
. . . . .
55-35 =c1 55-8-43(b)
. . . . .
55-34(d) =c1 55-8-44(b)
. . . . .
55-34(d) =c1 55-8-50, 55-8-51
. . . . .
55-20 =c1 55-8-52
. . . . .
55-20, =c2 55-21 =c1 55-8-53
. . . . .
55-19 =c1 55-8-54
. . . . .
55-20, =c2 55-21 =c1 55-8-55, 55-8-56
. . . . .
55-20 =c1 55-8-57
. . . . .
55-19 =c1 55-8-58
. . . . .
None =c1 55-9-01
. . . . .
55-75 =c1 55-9-02
. . . . .
55-76 =c1 55-9-03
. . . . .
55-77 =c1 55-9-04
. . . . .
55-78 =c1 55-9-05
. . . . .
55-79 =c1 55-9A-01
. . . . .
55-90 =c1 55-9A-02
. . . . .
55-91 =c1 55-9A-03
. . . . .
55-92 =c1 55-9A-04
. . . . .
55-93 =c1 55-9A-05
. . . . .
55-94 =c1 55-9A-06
. . . . .
55-95 =c1 55-9A-07
. . . . .
55-97 =c1 55-9A-08
. . . . .
None =c1 55-9A-09
. . . . .
55-98.1 =c1 55-10-01
. . . . .
55-99 =c1 55-10-02, 55-10-03
. . . . .
55-100 =c1 55-10-04
. . . . .
55-101 =c1 55-10-05
. . . . .
55-100 =c1 55-10-06
. . . . .
55-103 =c1 55-10-07
. . . . .
55-105 =c1 55-10-09
. . . . .
55-104 =c1 55-10-20
. . . . .
55-16(a) =c1 55-10-22
. . . . .
55-16 =c1 55-11-01
. . . . .
55-106 =c1 55-11-02
. . . . .
None =c1 55-11-03
. . . . .
55-108 =c1 55-11-03(g)
. . . . .
55-108.1 =c1 55-11-04
. . . . .
55-108.1 =c1 55-11-05
. . . . .
55-109 =c1 55-11-06
. . . . .
55-110 =c1 55-11-07
. . . . .
55-111 =c1 55-11-08
. . . . .
None =c1 55-12-01, 55-12-02
. . . . .
55-112 =c1 55-12-03
. . . . .
None =c1 55-13-01
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-13-02
. . . . .
55-101, =c2 55-112, 55-113, =c2 55-119 =c1 55-13-03
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-13-20
. . . . .
55-108, =c2 55-112, 55-113 =c1 55-13-21 to 55-13-26, =c1 55-13-28, 55-13-30, =c1 55-13-31
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-14-01
. . . . .
55-116, =c2 55-130.1 =c1 55-14-02
. . . . .
55-118 =c1 55-14-03
. . . . .
55-116, =c2 55-118 =c1 55-14-04
. . . . .
55-120 =c1 55-14-05 to =c1 55-14-07
. . . . .
55-114, =c2 55-119 =c1 55-14-08
. . . . .
55-54, =c2 55-114 =c1 55-14-20 to 55-14-24
. . . . .
None =c1 55-14-30
. . . . .
55-122, =c2 55-125, 55-126 =c1 55-14-31
. . . . .
55-124 =c2 to 55-125.1 =c1 55-14-32
. . . . .
55-127 =c1 55-14-33
. . . . .
55-125, =c2 55-129 =c1 55-14-40
. . . . .
55-130 =c1 55-14A-01
. . . . .
55-113.1 =c1 55-15-01
. . . . .
55-131 =c1 55-15-02
. . . . .
55-154 =c1 55-15-03
. . . . .
55-138, =c2 55-139 =c1 55-15-04
. . . . .
55-149 =c1 55-15-05
. . . . .
55-132, =c2 55-140 =c1 55-15-06
. . . . .
55-137 =c1 55-15-07
. . . . .
55-141 =c1 55-15-08
. . . . .
55-142 =c1 55-15-09
. . . . .
None =c1 55-15-10
. . . . .
55-143, =c2 55-144, 55-146 =c1 55-15-20
. . . . .
55-150 =c1 55-15-30
. . . . .
55-151 =c1 55-15-31
. . . . .
55-151, =c2 55-152 =c1 55-15-32, 55-15-33
. . . . .
None =c1 55-16-01
. . . . .
55-37 =c1 55-16-01(d)
. . . . .
55-37.1 =c1 55-16-02
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-03, 55-16-04
. . . . .
55-38 =c1 55-16-20
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-21, 55-16-22
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-01
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-02
. . . . .
55-153 =c1 55-17-03
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-04
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-05
. . . . .
55-36.1, =c2 55-157 to =c2 55-163, 55-164.2 =te =c1 55-10-01
. . . . .
55-99 =c1 55-10-02, 55-10-03
. . . . .
55-100 =c1 55-10-04
. . . . .
55-101 =c1 55-10-05
. . . . .
55-100 =c1 55-10-06
. . . . .
55-103 =c1 55-10-07
. . . . .
55-105 =c1 55-10-09
. . . . .
55-104 =c1 55-10-20
. . . . .
55-16(a) =c1 55-10-22
. . . . .
55-16 =c1 55-11-01
. . . . .
55-106 =c1 55-11-02
. . . . .
None =c1 55-11-03
. . . . .
55-108 =c1 55-11-03(g)
. . . . .
55-108.1 =c1 55-11-04
. . . . .
55-108.1 =c1 55-11-05
. . . . .
55-109 =c1 55-11-06
. . . . .
55-110 =c1 55-11-07
. . . . .
55-111 =c1 55-11-08
. . . . .
None =c1 55-12-01, 55-12-02
. . . . .
55-112 =c1 55-12-03
. . . . .
None =c1 55-13-01
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-13-02
. . . . .
55-101, =c2 55-112, 55-113, =c2 55-119 =c1 55-13-03
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-13-20
. . . . .
55-108, =c2 55-112, 55-113 =c1 55-13-21 to 55-13-26, =c1 55-13-28, 55-13-30, =c1 55-13-31
. . . . .
55-113 =c1 55-14-01
. . . . .
55-116, =c2 55-130.1 =c1 55-14-02
. . . . .
55-118 =c1 55-14-03
. . . . .
55-116, =c2 55-118 =c1 55-14-04
. . . . .
55-120 =c1 55-14-05 to =c1 55-14-07
. . . . .
55-114, =c2 55-119 =c1 55-14-08
. . . . .
55-54, =c2 55-114 =c1 55-14-20 to 55-14-24
. . . . .
None =c1 55-14-30
. . . . .
55-122, =c2 55-125, 55-126 =c1 55-14-31
. . . . .
55-124 =c2 to 55-125.1 =c1 55-14-32
. . . . .
55-127 =c1 55-14-33
. . . . .
55-125, =c2 55-129 =c1 55-14-40
. . . . .
55-130 =c1 55-14A-01
. . . . .
55-113.1 =c1 55-15-01
. . . . .
55-131 =c1 55-15-02
. . . . .
55-154 =c1 55-15-03
. . . . .
55-138, =c2 55-139 =c1 55-15-04
. . . . .
55-149 =c1 55-15-05
. . . . .
55-132, =c2 55-140 =c1 55-15-06
. . . . .
55-137 =c1 55-15-07
. . . . .
55-141 =c1 55-15-08
. . . . .
55-142 =c1 55-15-09
. . . . .
None =c1 55-15-10
. . . . .
55-143, =c2 55-144, 55-146 =c1 55-15-20
. . . . .
55-150 =c1 55-15-30
. . . . .
55-151 =c1 55-15-31
. . . . .
55-151, =c2 55-152 =c1 55-15-32, 55-15-33
. . . . .
None =c1 55-16-01
. . . . .
55-37 =c1 55-16-01(d)
. . . . .
55-37.1 =c1 55-16-02
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-03, 55-16-04
. . . . .
55-38 =c1 55-16-20
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-21, 55-16-22
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-01
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-02
. . . . .
55-153 =c1 55-17-03
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-04
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-05
. . . . .
55-36.1, =c2 55-157 to =c2 55-163, 55-164.2 =te =c1 55-14A-01
. . . . .
55-113.1 =c1 55-15-01
. . . . .
55-131 =c1 55-15-02
. . . . .
55-154 =c1 55-15-03
. . . . .
55-138, =c2 55-139 =c1 55-15-04
. . . . .
55-149 =c1 55-15-05
. . . . .
55-132, =c2 55-140 =c1 55-15-06
. . . . .
55-137 =c1 55-15-07
. . . . .
55-141 =c1 55-15-08
. . . . .
55-142 =c1 55-15-09
. . . . .
None =c1 55-15-10
. . . . .
55-143, =c2 55-144, 55-146 =c1 55-15-20
. . . . .
55-150 =c1 55-15-30
. . . . .
55-151 =c1 55-15-31
. . . . .
55-151, =c2 55-152 =c1 55-15-32, 55-15-33
. . . . .
None =c1 55-16-01
. . . . .
55-37 =c1 55-16-01(d)
. . . . .
55-37.1 =c1 55-16-02
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-03, 55-16-04
. . . . .
55-38 =c1 55-16-20
. . . . .
55-37, =c2 55-38 =c1 55-16-21, 55-16-22
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-01
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-02
. . . . .
55-153 =c1 55-17-03
. . . . .
55-3 =c1 55-17-04
. . . . .
None =c1 55-17-05
. . . . .
55-36.1, =c2 55-157 to =c2 55-163, 55-164.2 =te